Utah statutes.
59-22-201.   Findings and purpose.
(1)  Cigarette smoking presents serious public health concerns to the State
and to the citizens of the State.  The Surgeon General has determined that
smoking causes lung cancer, heart disease and other serious diseases, and that
there are hundreds of thousands of tobacco-related deaths in the United States
each year.  These diseases most often do not appear until many years after the
person in question begins smoking.
(2)  Cigarette smoking also presents serious financial concerns for the State.
Under certain health-care programs, the State may have a legal obligation to
provide medical assistance to eligible persons for health conditions
associated with cigarette smoking, and those persons may have a legal
entitlement to receive such medical assistance.
(3)  Under these programs, the State pays millions of dollars each year to
provide medical assistance for these persons for health conditions associated
with cigarette smoking.
(4)  It is the policy of the State that financial burdens imposed on the State
by cigarette smoking be borne by tobacco product manufacturers rather than by
the State to the extent that such manufacturers either determine to enter into
a settlement with the State or are found culpable by the courts.
(5)  On November 23, 1998, leading United States tobacco product manufacturers
entered into a settlement agreement, entitled the "Master Settlement
Agreement," with the State.  The Master Settlement Agreement obligates these
manufacturers, in return for a release of past, present, and certain future
claims against them as described therein, to pay substantial sums to the State
(tied in part to their volume of sales); to fund a national foundation devoted
to the interests of public health; and to make substantial changes in their
advertising and marketing practices and corporate culture, with the intention
of reducing underage smoking.
(6)  It would be contrary to the policy of the State if tobacco product
manufacturers who determine not to enter into such a settlement could use a
resulting cost advantage to derive large, short-term profits in the years
before liability may arise without ensuring that the State will have an
eventual source of recovery from them if they are proven to have acted
culpably.  It is thus in the interest of the State to require that such
manufacturers establish a reserve fund to guarantee a source of compensation
and to prevent such manufacturers from deriving large, short-term profits and
then becoming judgment-proof before liability may arise.
